sk-SK: Veľkosť závitu hriadeľa pedálu: 1/2 palca; 3/8 palca; 9/16 palca; M14; Iné
nl: Pedaalas schroefdraadmaat: 1/2 inch; 3/8 inch; 9/16 inch; M14; Overig
ro-RO: Dimensiuni ale axului pedalei: 1/2 inch; 3/8 inch; 9/16 inch; M14; Altele
nb: Pedalspindeltråd-størrelse: 1/2 tomme; 3/8 tomme; 9/16 tomme; M14; Annet
el: Pedal spindle νήμα μέγεθος: 1/2 ίντσας; 3/8 ίντσας; 9/16 ίντσας; M14; Άλλο
sl-SI: Velikost navoja osi pedala: 1/2 in; 3/8 in; 9/16 in; M14; Drugo
bg-BG: Размер на резбата на оста на педала: 1/2 инча; 3/8 инча; 9/16 инча; M14; Друг
pt-PT: Tamanho thread do eixo do pedal: 1/2 polegada; 3/8 polegada; 9/16 polegada; M14; Outro
tr: Pedal mili diş ölçüsü: 1/2 inç; 3/8 inç; 9/16 inç; M14; Diğer
da: Pedalakslens trådstørrelse: 1/2 tomme; 3/8 tomme; 9/16 tomme; M14; Andet
it: Dimensione della filettatura del perno del pedale: 1/2 pollice; 3/8 pollice; 9/16 pollice; M14; Altro
ko: 페달 스핀들 나사산 크기: 1/2인치; 3/8인치; 9/16인치; M14; 기타
pl: Rozmiar gwintu osi pedału: 1/2 cala; 3/8 cala; 9/16 cala; M14; Inne
hr-HR: Veličina navoja osovine pedale: 1/2 inča; 3/8 inča; 9/16 inča; M14; Ostalo
sv: Gängstorlek för pedalspindel: 1/2 tum; 3/8 tum; 9/16 tum; M14; Övrigt
zh-TW: 踏板軸心螺紋尺寸: 1/2 吋; 3/8 吋; 9/16 吋; M14; 其他
vi: Kích thước ren trục bàn đạp: 1/2 inch; 3/8 inch; 9/16 inch; M14; Khác
ru: Размер резьбы оси педали: 1/2 дюйма; 3/8 дюйма; 9/16 дюйма; M14; Другое
cs: Velikost závitu osy pedálu: 1/2 palce; 3/8 palce; 9/16 palce; M14; Ostatní
th: แกนเหยียบสำหรับขนาด: 1/2 นิ้ว; 3/8 นิ้ว; 9/16 นิ้ว; M14; อื่นๆ
en: Pedal spindle thread size: 1/2 inch; 3/8 inch; 9/16 inch; M14; Other
fi: Polkimen akselin kierrekoko: 1/2 tuumaa; 3/8 tuumaa; 9/16 tuumaa; M14; Muu
hu: Pedáltengely menetmérete: 1/2 hüvelyk; 3/8 hüvelyk; 9/16 hüvelyk; M14; Egyéb
fr: Taille du filetage de l’axe de pédale: 1/2 pouce; 3/8 pouce; 9/16 pouce; M14; Autre
es: Tamaño de rosca del eje del pedal: 1/2 pulgada; 3/8 pulgada; 9/16 pulgada; M14; Otro
ja: ペダルスピンドルスレッドサイズ: 1/2 インチ; 3/8 インチ; 9/16 インチ; M14; その他
zh-CN: 脚踏轴心螺纹规格: 1/2 英寸; 3/8 英寸; 9/16 英寸; M14; 其他
pt-BR: Pedal eixo tamanho da rosca: 1/2 polegada; 3/8 polegada; 9/16 polegada; M14; Outro
de: Gewindegröße der Pedalspindel: 1/2 Zoll; 3/8 Zoll; 9/16 Zoll; M14; Sonstige
lt-LT: Pedalo ašies sriegio dydis: 1/2 col.; 3/8 col.; 9/16 col.; M14; Kita